Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2715
Foreclosure consulting contract; provisions prohibited.

A provision in a foreclosure consulting contract is void as against public policy if the provision attempts or purports to:

(1) Waive any of the rights specified in sections 76-2713 to 76-2718 or the right to a jury trial;

(2) Consent to jurisdiction for litigation or choice of law in a state other than Nebraska;

(3) Consent to venue in a county other than the county in which the residence in foreclosure is located; or

(4) Impose any costs or fees greater than the actual costs and fees.

Laws 2008, LB123, § 15.